dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX P Y 111
PFX P a abase/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i abase/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u abase/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a ase/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a ase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a ase/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i ase/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i ase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i ase/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u ase/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u ase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u ase/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a base/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a base/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i base/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i base/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u base/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u base/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a buse/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i buse/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u buse/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a e/mX . LOC_pfx
PFX P i e/mX . LOC_pfx
PFX P u e/mX . LOC_pfx
PFX P a elise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i elise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u elise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a engise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i engise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u engise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a enise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i enise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u enise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a ese/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i ese/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u ese/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a esise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i esise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u esise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a ezise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i ezise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u ezise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a ise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i ise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u ise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a kuse/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i kuse/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u kuse/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a kwase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i kwase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u kwase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a lase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i lase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u lase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a lise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i lise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u lise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a luse/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i luse/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u luse/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a lwase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i lwase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u lwase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a nase/mX . ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i nase/mX . ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u nase/mX . ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a ngase/mX . INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i ngase/mX . INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u ngase/mX . INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a ngise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i ngise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u ngise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a nise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i nise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u nise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a njengase/mX . COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i njengase/mX . COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u njengase/mX . COMPARATIVE_PARTICLE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a obuse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i obuse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u obuse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a okuse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i okuse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u okuse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a oluse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i oluse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u oluse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a ose/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i ose/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u ose/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a sase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i sase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u sase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a sise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i sise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u sise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a use/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i use/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u use/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a wase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i wase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u wase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a yase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i yase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u yase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a zase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i zase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u zase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a zise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i zise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u zise/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx

PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q u o/mX . LOC_pfx

PFX R Y 3
PFX R 0 ko o LOC_pfx
PFX R a ku . LOC_pfx
PFX R u ku . LOC_pfx

PFX S Y 2
PFX S a kwa . LOC_pfx
PFX S u kwa . LOC_pfx

PFX T Y 1
PFX T 0 kw i LOC_pfx

PFX U Y 8
PFX U u baka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u buka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u ka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u kuka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u lika/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u luka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u sika/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u zika/u . POSSESSIVE

PFX u Y 20
PFX u 0 a .
PFX u 0 aba .
PFX u 0 e .
PFX u 0 eli .
PFX u 0 engi .
PFX u 0 eni .
PFX u 0 esi .
PFX u 0 ezi .
PFX u 0 kwe .
PFX u 0 kweli .
PFX u 0 kwesi .
PFX u 0 kwezi .
PFX u 0 neli .
PFX u 0 nesi .
PFX u 0 nezi .
PFX u 0 ngeli .
PFX u 0 o .
PFX u 0 obu .
PFX u 0 oku .
PFX u 0 olu .

SFX m Y 7
SFX m a eni/X . LOC_sfx
SFX m e eni/X . LOC_sfx
SFX m o eni/X wo LOC_sfx
SFX m u ini/X wu LOC_sfx
SFX m 0 ni/X i LOC_sfx
SFX m o weni/X [^w]o LOC_sfx
SFX m u wini/X [^w]u LOC_sfx

PFX V Y 50
PFX V 0 a . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 a . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 aba . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 aba . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 abange . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 abu . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 aka . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 aku . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 ali . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 alu . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 ange . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 angi . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 ani . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 asi . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 awa . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 awu . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 ayi . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 azi . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 ba . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 bu . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 e . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 eli . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 elinge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 enge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 engi . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 enginge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 eni . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 eninge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 esi . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 esinge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 ezi . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 ezinge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 i . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 ka . RELATIVE
PFX V 0 ku . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 li . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 lu . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 ngi . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 ni . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 o . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 obu . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 obunge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 oku . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 okunge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 olu . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 olunge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 onge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 si . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 u . COPULATIVE
PFX V 0 zi . COPULATIVE
