dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
abafiki/NRS
abakhulumeli/NRS
abanikazi/NRS
abasiki/NRS
abelaphi/NRS
amagemfu/NP
amalungu/NP
amasoka/NP
buthuntu/VY
iBamokgoko/NOT
ibemba/NP
iBlue Horizon/NOT
iBulgerivier/NOT
iCleveden/NOT
iDe Bron/NOT
ideski/NP
iDundonald/NOT
iFairland/NOT
iGardenia Park/NOT
igidi/NP
iHlabisa/NOT
ihlwathi/NP
ikloba/NP
iKnole Park/NOT
iLonehill/NOT
iMatimatolo/NOT
imigudu/NP
imizuzwana/NP
iMorokweng/NOT
iNorth End/NOT
inzima/NP
iPietersburg North/NOT
iRoodekrans/NOT
isici/NP
isinguni/NP
iSoekmekaar/NOT
itheku/NP
iThrings Post/NOT
iWeavind Park/NOT
izigi/NP
izinhlanzi/NP
izivumelwano/NP
lukhuni/VY
mhlophe/VY
mpofu/VY
ngwevu/VY
odadewethu/NRS
omatilasi/NRS
osinyaka/NRS
ubhekeni/NRSU
ubhozo/NRSU
ucilo/NRSU
udabe/NP
udlothovu/NRSU
uDumisani/NRSU
uGert/NRSU
uhodoba/NRSU
uJacob/NRSU
ujojo/NRSU
ukhulu/NRSU
uKotze/NRSU
uLwesibili/NRSU
umame/NRSU
uMangosuthu/NRSU
umbali/NRSU
umdlwenguli/NRSU
umelusi/NRSU
umgidi/NRSU
umgubho/NP
umlobi/NRSU
uMnz/NRSU
umshumayeli/NRSU
umumbi/NRSU
umuso/NP
ungazi/NRSU
uNkululeko/NRSU
upelepele/NRSU
uqhotho/NRSU
uSipho/NRSU
uThandeka/NRSU
uWillemse/NRSU
uzulu/NRSU
PFX B 0 aba [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 abangazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elingayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elizo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ena [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 engazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 engingazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 engiyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eningazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 esingayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 esingazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 esizo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ezingazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 eziyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 oba [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 obuyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 okungayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okuzo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 olungazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 oluyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ongayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 oyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ozo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX C 0 aseku/mX [^aeiou] POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 baseku/mX [^aeiou] POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 ekw/mX [ae] LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 eniseku/mX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 ezisek/mX o RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 kusekw/mX [ae] COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 liseku/mX [^aeiou] COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 nasek/mX o ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 ngisekw/mX [ae] COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 obuseku/mX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 osek/mX o RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 sisekw/mX [ae] COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX O u ezise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O i ose . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a abase/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u base/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u enise/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a kwase/mX . POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P i nase/mX . ASSOCIATIVE_COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P u obuse/mX . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX P a use/mX . COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX U u baka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u buka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u ka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u kuka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u lika/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u luka/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u sika/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX U u zika/u . POSSESSIVE
PFX V 0 abange . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 eninge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 esinge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 olunge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 eli . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 esiba . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 ezin . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 olungelu . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 ongem . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
